dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.dix
    <pardef n="t/aġen__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>aġen</l><r>aġen<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>waġen</l><r>aġen<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/okna__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>okna</l><r>okna<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kejjen</l><r>okna<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/asir__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>asir</l><r>asir<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>osra</l><r>asir<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nb/id__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>id</l><r>id<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjed</l><r>id<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/enduq__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>enduq</l><r>enduq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>niedaq</l><r>enduq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/errieq__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>errieq</l><r>errieq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieraq</l><r>errieq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/ifer__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ifer</l><r>ifer<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wiefer</l><r>ifer<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għas/fur__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>fur</l><r>fur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>afar</l><r>fur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/ussett__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ussett</l><r>ussett<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sieset</l><r>ussett<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bor/ża__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ża</l><r>ża<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oż</l><r>ża<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dgħaj/sa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>sa</l><r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jes</l><r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="p/inzell__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>inzell</l><r>inzell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>niezel</l><r>inzell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/akkuna__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>akkuna</l><r>akkuna<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kaken</l><r>akkuna<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/as__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jus</l><r>as<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħr/afa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>afa</l><r>afa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjef</l><r>afa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/emm__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>emm</l><r>emm<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mija</l><r>emm<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="g/erżuma__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>erżuma</l><r>erżuma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieżem</l><r>erżuma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="p/antor__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>antor</l><r>antor<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>natar</l><r>antor<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/alq__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>alq</l><r>alq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lieq</l><r>alq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>luq</l><r>alq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="xe/nxul__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>nxul</l><r>nxul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>xniel</l><r>nxul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/aruf__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>aruf</l><r>aruf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rief</l><r>aruf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/anda__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>anda</l><r>anda<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aned</l><r>anda<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nadi</l><r>anda<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="v/ers__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ers</l><r>ers<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rus</l><r>ers<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/aħar__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>aħar</l><r>aħar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iħra</l><r>aħar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/artab__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>artab</l><r>artab<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rotob</l><r>artab<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/add__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>add</l><r>add<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dud</l><r>add<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="xal/l__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>l</l><r>l<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>el</l><r>l<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/abiħ__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>abiħ</l><r>abiħ<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bieħ</l><r>abiħ<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/allut__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>allut</l><r>allut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lalet</l><r>allut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/uftieħ__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>uftieħ</l><r>uftieħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fietaħ</l><r>uftieħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/ula__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ula</l><r>ula<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wiel</l><r>ula<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/iġnun__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>iġnun</l><r>iġnun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ġienen</l><r>iġnun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/andiera__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>andiera</l><r>andiera<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nadar</l><r>andiera<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x/ahar__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ahar</l><r>ahar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hur</l><r>ahar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ż/obb__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>obb</l><r>obb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bub</l><r>obb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/arvetta__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arvetta</l><r>arvetta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rievet</l><r>arvetta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/ultan__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ultan</l><r>ultan<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>laten</l><r>ultan<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sk/ola__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ola</l><r>ola<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjel</l><r>ola<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="p/astaż__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>astaż</l><r>astaż<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sataż</l><r>astaż<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="vers"><i>v</i><par n="v/ers__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="taġen"><i>t</i><par n="t/aġen__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="rokna"><i>r</i><par n="r/okna__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mula"><i>m</i><par n="m/ula__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="miġnun"><i>m</i><par n="m/iġnun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="demm"><i>d</i><par n="d/emm__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għasfur"><i>għas</i><par n="għas/fur__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qallut"><i>q</i><par n="q/allut__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bandiera"><i>b</i><par n="b/andiera__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="difer"><i>d</i><par n="d/ifer__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pantor"><i>p</i><par n="p/antor__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xall"><i>xal</i><par n="xal/l__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħadd"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/add__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sarvetta"><i>s</i><par n="s/arvetta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="russett"><i>r</i><par n="r/ussett__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xenxul"><i>xe</i><par n="xe/nxul__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sponża"><i>spon</i><par n="bor/ża__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ras"><i>r</i><par n="r/as__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="senduq"><i>s</i><par n="s/enduq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="muftieħ"><i>m</i><par n="m/uftieħ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sabiħ"><i>s</i><par n="s/abiħ__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħrafa"><i>ħr</i><par n="ħr/afa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qasir"><i>q</i><par n="q/asir__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sultan"><i>s</i><par n="s/ultan__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pastaż"><i>p</i><par n="p/astaż__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="artab"><i></i><par n="/artab__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="takkuna"><i>t</i><par n="t/akkuna__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pinzell"><i>p</i><par n="p/inzell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="baħar"><i>b</i><par n="b/aħar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="nbid"><i>nb</i><par n="nb/id__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="serrieq"><i>s</i><par n="s/errieq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħaruf"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/aruf__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żobb"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/obb__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="banda"><i>b</i><par n="b/anda__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħalq"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/alq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="dgħajsa"><i>dgħaj</i><par n="dgħaj/sa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xahar"><i>x</i><par n="x/ahar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="skola"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/ola__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gerżuma"><i>g</i><par n="g/erżuma__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="borża"><i>bor</i><par n="bor/ża__n_GD"/></e>
